Utah statutes.
10-7-72.   Appearance by agent of corporation -- Bench warrant for default.
At the time appointed in the summons, the corporation must appear by agent or
attorney and plead thereto the same as a natural person. In case no appearance
is made on or before the hour appointed, the court may issue a bench warrant
for the person served as the officer or agent of the corporation, requiring
him to be brought forthwith before the court to plead on its behalf.
